Hawaii, session 2025, GM1390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that low-income subsidy
programs, including medicare, medicaid, and medicare savings
programs such as medicare part D extra help, can help reduce
out-of-pocket costs for individuals with limited income by
offsetting their medical and prescription drug costs, such as
premiums, deductibles, copayments, coinsurance, and lifetime
late enrollment penalties. The legislature further finds that
although individuals with low income, those who speak English as
a second language, or those who live in rural areas may qualify
for these programs, they may have no or limited access to the
benefits, as they may not be aware of or need assistance with
the application or eligibility renewal process.
The legislature further finds that the executive office on
aging of the department of health provides free information and
one-on-one counseling on medicare. Since 2022, the executive
office on aging has been receiving a significantly higher volume
of referrals from med-QUEST to assist uninsured or underinsured
2025-3261 HB705 GDI HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO.
-1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
individuals who are losing their medicaid eligibility and need
to find other health coverage. The overflow and referrals are
made to community partners within forty-eight hours to help with
food, housing, utilities, employment, and other needs.
The legislature also finds that during the COVID-19
pandemic, the med-QUEST division of the department of human
services paused disenrollments based on eligibility issues and
all medicaid members received continuous uninterrupted coverage
through March 2023, regardless of their change in eligibility.
Following the 2023 Maui wildfires, the med-QUEST division again
paused all eligibility disenrollments statewide until the end of
2023. However, the med-QUEST division has resumed its annual
eligibility redetermination process, and therefore, people have
been or will be receiving notices and forms to renew their
coverage.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Establish within the executive office on aging a medi-
medi project to assist underserved populations in the
State who may qualify for various low-income subsidy
programs to gain access to their benefits;
2025-3261 HB705 CDl HMSO

■HiwwiniiiiimiH

Page 3 H.B. NO. "
h

I . s.D. 1
C.D. 1
(2) Appropriate funds to the executive office on aging for
staff and operating expenses related to administering
the medi-medi project; and
(3) Require and appropriate funds for the executive office
on aging to develop a one-year pilot project to make
available the medi-medi project to kupuna and families
living in a disadvantaged community, specifically the
Kalihi valley catchment areas.
SECTION 2. (a) There is established within the advocacy,
education, and outreach section of the executive office on aging
a medi-medi project to assist older adults, medicare
beneficiaries, individuals with disabilities, and other
underserved populations who may qualify for various low-income
subsidy programs, including medicare, medicaid, and medicare
savings programs such as medicare part D extra help, to gain
access to their benefits.
(b) The medi-medi project shall:
(1) Develop and implement a community outreach program;
(2) Streamline the application process for various low-
income subsidy programs; and
2025-3261 HB705 CDl HMSO 3

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) Provide referrals and assistance to other low-income
programs.
(c) The executive office on aging shall submit a report of
its findings and recommendations regarding the medi-medi
project, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature
no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular
session.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $121,016 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 for the executive office on aging, to be expended as
follows:
(1) $71,016 for the establishment of one full-time
equivalent (1.0 FTE) position to implement and
administer the medi-medi project; and
(2) $50,000 for operating expenses, including education
and outreach.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the executive
office on aging for the purposes of this Act.
2025-3261 HB705 CDl HMSO
■■■■iiiiiiiiiiiiniiii

Page 5
H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. (a) The legislature finds that the medi-medi
project will be able to supplement programs that provide health
assessments and wraparound support to kupuna and their families.
Additionally, by providing a medi-medi project to kupuna and
their families in impoverished communities, the medi-medi
project can be expanded to these populations to serve disparate
populations living in persistent poverty who are potentially
eligible or are enrolled in Medicaid.
The purpose of this section is to require and appropriate
funds for the executive office on aging to develop a one-year
pilot project to provide the medi-medi project to kupuna and
families living in a disadvantaged community, specifically the
Kalihi valley catchment areas.
(b) The executive office on aging shall develop a one-year
pilot project to provide the medi-medi project to kupuna and
families living in a disadvantaged community, specifically the
Kalihi valley catchment areas.
(c) The executive office on aging shall submit a report of
its findings and recommendations regarding the pilot project,
including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later
2025-3261 HB705 CDl HMSO 5

Page 6
H.B. NO. ’
C.D. 1
than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session
of 2027.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $300,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the
executive office on aging to develop a pilot project to provide
the medi-medi project to kupuna and families living in a
disadvantaged community, specifically the Kalihi valley
catchment areas.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the executive
office on aging for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3261 HB705 CDl HMSO 6
iiMniiHiiiiniiiHiiD

705
H.B. NO.
I b
oco
O b
APPROVED this 3rd day of July , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 705, HD 1,SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 705, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
188